North Dakota, session 69, HB1433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 50-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Dementia response program.
The department shall establish a dementia response program to be administered by a state
dementia coordinator. The dementia response program shall:
1. Implement an Alzheimer's and dementia state plan;
2. Update the Alzheimer's and dementia state plan every three years by convening a
work group that includes:
a. Individuals living with dementia;
b. Care partners and family members of individuals living with dementia;
c. Representatives of home and facility - based care professionals ;
d. Representatives of the medical profession with experience in diagnosing and
treating Alzheimer's and dementia;
e. A representative of a leading national organization that advocates on behalf of
individuals living with Alzheimer's or dementia; and
f. A representative of an organization that advocates for older adults;
3. Collect and disseminate Alzheimer's and dementia data through the use of data
collected by the state and use of the behavioral risk factor surveillance system,
including caregiver and cognitive decline models, on a rotating basis; and
Page No. 1 25.1048.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. Implement a statewide public awareness campaign that includes information to reduce
stigma, encourage risk reduction activity, and emphasize the importance of early
detection and diagnosis.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
DEMENTIA RESPONSE PROGRAM - FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITION. There is
appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $250,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
department of health and human services for the purpose of administering the dementia
response program, the behavioral risk factor surveillance models, and for a full-time equivalent
position to administer the program as the state dementia coordinator, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 2 25.1048.01000